Washington statutes.
RCW 32.08.060

Procedure upon approval.

In case of approval, the director shall forthwith give notice thereof to the proposed incorporators, and file one of the duplicate certificates in his or her own office, and shall transmit the other to the secretary of state. Upon receipt from the proposed incorporators of the same fees as are required for filing and recording other incorporation certificates, the secretary of state shall file the certificate and record the same. Upon the filing of said incorporation certificate in duplicate approved as aforesaid in the offices of the director and the secretary of state, the persons named therein and their successors shall thereupon become and be a corporation, which corporation shall have the powers and be subject to the duties and obligations prescribed in this title and its corporate existence shall be perpetual, unless sooner terminated pursuant to law, but such corporation shall not receive deposits or engage in business until authorized so to do by the director as provided in RCW 32.08.070.

[ 1994 c 92 s 312; 1981 c 302 s 26; 1957 c 80 s 1; 1955 c 13 s 32.08.060. Prior: 1915 c 175 s 4, part; RRS s 3316, part.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 302: See note following RCW 19.76.100.